Utah statutes.
3-1-42.   Association's records.

(1)  An association shall keep as permanent records:

(a)  minutes of meetings of its members and board of directors;

(b)  a record of each action taken by the consent of the members or board of directors without a meeting;

(c)  a record of each action taken on behalf of the association by a committee of the board of directors in place of the board of directors; and

(d)  a record of waivers of notices of meetings of members, board of directors, or committees of the board of directors.

(2)  An association shall maintain:

(a)  appropriate accounting records; and

(b)  a record of the names and addresses of its members and shareholders.

(3)  An association shall maintain its records in written form or in a form capable of being converted into written form within a reasonable time.

(4)  An association shall keep a copy of the following records at its principal office:

(a)  its most current articles of incorporation;

(b)  its most current bylaws;

(c)  the minutes of meetings of members, board of directors, and committees for the past three years;

(d)  a list of the names and business addresses of its current officers and directors;

(e)  its most recent annual reports delivered to the division as provided under Section 3-1-25; and

(f)  financial statements prepared for periods ending during the last three years.



Enacted by Chapter 204, 1994 General Session

